Illinois, session 104th, SB803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Agency Energy Efficiency Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 20/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Agency Energy Efficiency Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-559, eff. 6-1-08.)